Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.180

Access to campus and student information directories by official recruiting representatives—Informing students of educational and career opportunities.

If the board of directors of a school district provides access to the campus and the student information directory to persons or groups which make students aware of occupational or educational options, the board shall provide access to official recruiting representatives of the job corps, peace corps, and AmeriCorps, and to official recruiting representatives of the military forces of the state and the United States for the purpose of informing students of educational and career opportunities available in the military, which must be equal to and no less than access provided to other postsecondary occupational or educational representatives. As used in this section, "access" includes, but is not limited to, the number of days provided and the type of presentation space.

[ 2013 c 25 s 1; 1980 c 96 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.535.]